Illinois, session 104th, SB4097.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named sums, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and purposes 7hereinafter named, are appropriated from the General Revenue 8Fund to meet the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 9following divisions of the Department of Corrections for the 10fiscal year ending June 30, 2027:11FOR OPERATIONS12GENERAL OFFICE13  For Personal Services............................41,758,00014  For State Contributions to15   Social Security..................................3,195,00016  For Contractual Services.........................16,015,00017  For Travel..........................................120,00018  For Commodities.....................................420,00019  For Printing.........................................42,00020  For Equipment.....................................7,000,00021  For Electronic Data Processing...................36,100,00022  For Telecommunication Services....................7,478,30023  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................565,500  SB4097- 2 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Tort Claims..................................12,500,0002  For Refunds...........................................5,0003    Total                                        $125,198,800 4STATEWIDE SERVICES AND GRANTS 5    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Department of 7Corrections for the objects and purposes hereinafter named:8Payable from the General Revenue Fund:9  For Sheriffs' Fees for Conveying Prisoners..........249,90010  For the State's share of Assistant State's11   Attorney's salaries - reimbursement12   to counties pursuant to Chapter 55 of13   the Illinois Compiled Statutes.....................200,20014  For Repairs, Maintenance, and Other15   Capital Improvements...............................100,00016    Total                                            $550,100 17    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 18thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 19Department of Corrections for the objects and purposes 20hereinafter named:21Payable from the Department of Corrections22Reimbursement and Education Fund:23  For payment of expenses associated24   with School District Programs....................5,000,000  SB4097- 3 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For payment of expenses associated with2   federal programs, including, but not3   limited to, construction of additional4   beds, treatment programs, and5   juvenile supervision.............................5,000,0006  For payment of expenses associated with 7   miscellaneous programs, including, but not8   limited to, medical costs, food expenditures,9   and various construction costs..................59,400,00010    Total                                         $69,400,000 11    Section 15. The amount of $24,000,000, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 13Corrections from the General Revenue Fund for expenses related 14to statewide hospitalization services. 15    Section 20. The sum of $45,000,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 17business June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore made 18of such purpose in Article 49, Section 10 of Public Act 19104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Department of 20Corrections Reimbursement and Education Fund to the Department 21of Corrections for expenses related with IT infrastructure 22upgrades, including, but not limited to, device purchases, 23repairs, maintenance, and other capital improvements.   SB4097- 4 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1    Section 25. The amount of $20,000,000, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 3business June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore made 4of such purpose in Article 49, Section 10 of Public Act 5104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Department of 6Corrections Reimbursement and Education Fund to the Department 7of Corrections for expenses related to contractual services. 8    Section 30. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much thereof 9as may be necessary, appropriated from the Department of 10Corrections Reimbursement and Education Fund to the Department 11of Corrections for expenses related to Electronic Healthcare 12Records. 13    Section 35. The sum of $20,000,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Facility 15Repair and Maintenance Fund to the Department of Corrections 16for repairs, maintenance, and other permanent improvements. 17    Section 40. The following named sums, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 19purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the General 20Revenue Fund to meet the ordinary and contingent expenses of 21the Department of Corrections:22EDUCATION SERVICES23  For Personal Services............................23,510,000  SB4097- 5 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Student, Member, and Inmate2   Compensation.............................................03  For State Contributions to4   Social Security .................................1,799,0005  For Contractual Services.........................12,935,0006  For Travel...........................................10,0007  For Commodities.....................................315,0008  For Printing.........................................60,0009  For Equipment........................................75,00010  For Telecommunication Services........................4,50011  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................4,50012    Total                                         $38,713,00013PAROLE14  For Personal Services............................48,728,00015  For State Contributions to16   Social Security..................................3,728,00017  For Contractual Services..........................1,425,00018  For Travel..........................................215,00019  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,20   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................37,50021  For Commodities......................................31,00022  For Printing..........................................7,00023  For Equipment........................................50,00024  For Telecommunication Services....................5,600,00025  For Operation of Auto Equipment...................1,500,00026    Total                                         $61,321,500  SB4097- 6 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1RE-ENTRY SERVICES2  For Personal Services............................16,110,0003  For Student, Member, and Inmate4   Compensation........................................46,4005  For State Contributions to6   Social Security..................................1,233,0007  For Contractual Services.........................32,834,0008  For Travel...........................................50,0009  For Travel and Allowances for Committed, 10   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners........................011  For Commodities.....................................105,00012  For Printing..........................................7,00013  For Equipment.......................................140,00014  For Telecommunication Services......................100,00015  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................40,00016    Total                                         $50,665,40017FIELD SERVICES18  For Personal Services............................14,049,00019  For State Contributions to20   Social Security..................................1,075,00021  For Contractual Services........................187,000,00022  For Travel...........................................80,00023  For Commodities...................................1,434,00024  For Printing..........................................4,20025  For Equipment.......................................100,00026  For Telecommunication Services......................130,000  SB4097- 7 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................350,0002    Total                                        $204,222,200 3    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 4thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 5the Department of Corrections from the General Revenue Fund 6for:7BIG MUDDY RIVER CORRECTIONAL CENTER8  For Personal Services............................40,899,0009  For Student, Member, and Inmate10   Compensation.......................................380,00011  For State Contributions to12   Social Security..................................3,129,00013  For Contractual Services.........................13,290,00014  For Travel...........................................22,00015  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,16   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................14,00017  For Commodities...................................3,700,00018  For Printing.........................................40,00019  For Equipment........................................75,00020  For Telecommunication Services......................112,20021  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................195,00022    Total                                         $61,856,20023CENTRALIA CORRECTIONAL CENTER24  For Personal Services............................46,495,00025  For Student, Member, and Inmate  SB4097- 8 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1   Compensation.......................................460,0002  For State Contributions to3   Social Security..................................3,557,0004  For Contractual Services..........................9,500,0005  For Travel...........................................22,0006  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,7   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................13,5008  For Commodities...................................3,050,0009  For Printing.........................................35,00010  For Equipment.......................................105,00011  For Telecommunication Services......................120,00012  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................70,00013    Total                                         $63,427,50014DANVILLE CORRECTIONAL CENTER15  For Personal Services............................36,581,00016  For Student, Member, and Inmate17   Compensation.......................................481,00018  For State Contributions to19   Social Security..................................2,799,00020  For Contractual Services.........................12,600,00021  For Travel...........................................40,00022  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,23   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................13,00024  For Commodities...................................4,000,00025  For Printing.........................................30,00026  For Equipment........................................75,000  SB4097- 9 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Telecommunication Services.......................84,8002  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................325,0003    Total                                         $57,028,8004DECATUR CORRECTIONAL CENTER5  For Personal Services............................21,913,0006  For Student, Member, and Inmate7   Compensation.......................................105,0008  For State Contributions to9   Social Security..................................1,677,00010  For Contractual Services..........................7,020,00011  For Travel............................................5,00012  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,13   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................6,00014  For Commodities...................................1,050,00015  For Printing.........................................21,00016  For Equipment.......................................110,00017  For Telecommunication Services.......................44,00018  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................70,00019    Total                                         $32,021,00020DIXON CORRECTIONAL CENTER21  For Personal Services............................65,142,00022  For Student, Member, and Inmate23   Compensation.......................................375,00024  For State Contributions to25   Social Security..................................4,984,00026  For Contractual Services.........................27,600,000  SB4097- 10 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Travel...........................................70,0002  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,3   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................14,0004  For Commodities...................................3,000,0005  For Printing.........................................52,0006  For Equipment.......................................235,0007  For Telecommunication Services......................300,0008  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................300,0009    Total                                        $102,072,00010EAST MOLINE CORRECTIONAL CENTER11  For Personal Services............................32,399,00012  For Student, Member, and Inmate13   Compensation.......................................155,90014  For State Contributions to15   Social Security..................................2,479,00016  For Contractual Services..........................7,760,00017  For Travel...........................................15,00018  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,19   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................6,50020  For Commodities...................................1,750,00021  For Printing.........................................17,00022  For Equipment.......................................140,00023  For Telecommunication Services......................188,00024  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................190,00025    Total                                         $45,100,40026SOUTHWESTERN ILLINOIS CORRECTIONAL CENTER  SB4097- 11 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Personal Services............................25,211,0002  For Student, Member, and Inmate3   Compensation.......................................145,0004  For State Contributions to5   Social Security..................................1,929,0006  For Contractual Services.........................11,600,0007  For Travel...........................................13,0008  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,9   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................7,50010  For Commodities...................................1,435,00011  For Printing.........................................25,00012  For Equipment........................................75,00013  For Telecommunication Services.......................80,00014  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................60,00015    Total                                         $40,580,50016KEWANEE LIFE SKILLS RE-ENTRY CENTER17  For Personal Services............................20,424,00018  For Student, Member, and Inmate19   Compensation........................................82,00020  For State Contributions to21   Social Security..................................1,563,00022  For Contractual Services..........................4,130,00023  For Travel............................................5,00024  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,25   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................1,20026  For Commodities.....................................783,000  SB4097- 12 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Printing.........................................13,0002  For Equipment........................................60,0003  For Telecommunication Services......................170,0004  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................63,0005    Total                                         $27,294,2006GRAHAM CORRECTIONAL CENTER7  For Personal Services............................54,900,0008  For Student, Member, and Inmate9   Compensation.......................................420,00010  For State Contributions to Social Security........4,200,00011  For Contractual Services.........................14,715,00012  For Travel...........................................60,00013  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,14   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................6,00015  For Commodities...................................4,500,00016  For Printing.........................................36,00017  For Equipment.......................................275,00018  For Telecommunication Services.......................65,00019  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................160,00020    Total                                         $79,337,00021ILLINOIS RIVER CORRECTIONAL CENTER22  For Personal Services............................38,185,00023  For Student, Member, and Inmate24   Compensation.......................................460,00025  For State Contributions to Social Security .......2,922,00026  For Contractual Services.........................12,680,000  SB4097- 13 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Travel...........................................30,0002  For Travel and Allowance for Committed,3   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................16,0004  For Commodities..................................10,000,0005  For Printing.........................................49,0006  For Equipment........................................75,0007  For Telecommunication Services.......................75,0008  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................420,0009    Total                                         $64,912,00010HILL CORRECTIONAL CENTER11  For Personal Services............................33,883,00012  For Student, Member, and Inmate13   Compensation.......................................475,00014  For State Contributions to Social Security .......2,592,00015  For Contractual Services.........................14,297,00016  For Travel...........................................22,50017  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,18   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................8,00019  For Commodities...................................8,750,00020  For Printing.........................................28,00021  For Equipment.......................................140,00022  For Telecommunication Services.......................65,00023  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................245,00024    Total                                         $60,505,50025JACKSONVILLE CORRECTIONAL CENTER26  For Personal Services............................41,828,000  SB4097- 14 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Student, Member, and Inmate2   Compensation.......................................235,0003  For State Contributions to4   Social Security..................................3,200,0005  For Contractual Services..........................7,250,0006  For Travel............................................7,5007  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,8   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................13,0009  For Commodities...................................2,233,80010  For Printing.........................................28,00011  For Equipment........................................75,00012  For Telecommunication Services.......................90,00013  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................175,00014    Total                                         $55,135,30015JOLIET TREATMENT CENTER16  For Personal Services............................54,308,00017  For Student, Member, and Inmate18   Compensation........................................45,00019  For State Contributions to20   Social Security..................................4,155,00021  For Contractual Services.........................21,180,00022  For Travel...........................................13,00023  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,24   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................1,00025  For Commodities...................................1,063,00026  For Printing.........................................19,000  SB4097- 15 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Equipment.......................................110,0002  For Telecommunication Services......................200,0003  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................75,0004    Total                                         $81,169,0005LAWRENCE CORRECTIONAL CENTER6  For Personal Services............................48,354,0007  For Student, Member, and Inmate8   Compensation.......................................235,0009  For State Contributions to10   Social Security..................................3,700,00011  For Contractual Services.........................16,030,00012  For Travel...........................................35,00013  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,14   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................3,20015  For Commodities...................................2,950,00016  For Printing.........................................30,00017  For Equipment.......................................290,00018  For Telecommunication Services.......................97,00019  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................210,00020    Total                                         $71,934,20021LINCOLN CORRECTIONAL CENTER22  For Personal Services............................25,303,00023  For Student, Member, and Inmate24   Compensation.......................................190,00025  For State Contributions to26   Social Security..................................1,936,000  SB4097- 16 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Contractual Services..........................7,700,0002  For Travel...........................................10,0003  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,4   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................21,0005  For Commodities...................................1,827,0006  For Printing.........................................19,0007  For Equipment........................................75,0008  For Telecommunication Services......................250,0009  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................94,00010    Total                                         $37,425,00011LOGAN CORRECTIONAL CENTER12  For Personal Services............................47,802,00013  For Student, Member, and Inmate14   Compensation.......................................400,00015  For State Contributions to16   Social Security..................................3,657,00017  For Contractual Services.........................30,500,00018  For Travel...........................................10,00019  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,20   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................11,00021  For Commodities...................................4,200,00022  For Printing.........................................40,00023  For Equipment.......................................125,00024  For Telecommunication Services......................157,00025  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................220,00026    Total                                         $87,122,000  SB4097- 17 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1MENARD CORRECTIONAL CENTER2  For Personal Services............................84,691,0003  For Student, Member, and Inmate4   Compensation.......................................495,0005  For State Contributions to6   Social Security..................................6,479,0007  For Contractual Services.........................19,800,0008  For Travel..........................................105,0009  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,10   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................7,30011  For Commodities...................................7,000,00012  For Printing.........................................55,00013  For Equipment.......................................125,00014  For Telecommunication Services......................290,00015  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................400,00016    Total                                        $119,447,30017MURPHYSBORO LIFE SKILLS RE-ENTRY CENTER18  For Personal Services............................12,784,00019  For Student, Member, and Inmate20   Compensation........................................43,50021  For State Contributions to22   Social Security....................................978,00023  For Contractual Services..........................2,048,00024  For Travel...........................................11,00025  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,26   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners........................0  SB4097- 18 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Commodities.....................................623,3002  For Printing..........................................8,0003  For Equipment........................................60,0004  For Telecommunication Services.......................29,0005  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................15,0006    Total                                         $16,599,8007PINCKNEYVILLE CORRECTIONAL CENTER8  For Personal Services............................43,881,0009  For Student, Member, and Inmate10   Compensation.......................................395,00011  For State Contributions to12   Social Security..................................3,357,00013  For Contractual Services.........................15,850,00014  For Travel...........................................45,00015  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,16   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................11,70017  For Commodities...................................4,300,00018  For Printing.........................................45,00019  For Equipment........................................75,00020  For Telecommunication Services.......................57,70021  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................215,00022    Total                                         $68,232,40023PONTIAC CORRECTIONAL CENTER24  For Personal Services............................56,025,00025  For Student, Member, and Inmate26   Compensation.......................................176,000  SB4097- 19 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For State Contributions to2   Social Security..................................4,286,0003  For Contractual Services.........................21,920,0004  For Travel...........................................50,0005  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,6   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................3,5007  For Commodities...................................2,900,0008  For Printing.........................................40,0009  For Equipment........................................75,00010  For Telecommunication Services......................310,00011  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................150,00012    Total                                         $85,935,50013ROBINSON CORRECTIONAL CENTER14  For Personal Services............................29,232,00015  For Student, Member, and16   Inmate Compensation................................265,00017  For State Contributions to 18   Social Security..................................2,237,00019  For Contractual Services..........................9,580,00020  For Travel...........................................23,00021  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,22   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................28,00023  For Commodities...................................2,700,00024  For Printing.........................................18,00025  For Equipment.......................................110,00026  For Telecommunication Services.......................65,000  SB4097- 20 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................90,0002    Total                                         $44,348,0003SHAWNEE CORRECTIONAL CENTER4  For Personal Services............................38,346,0005  For Student, Member, and6   Inmate Compensation................................465,0007  For State Contributions to8   Social Security..................................2,934,0009  For Contractual Services.........................12,750,00010  For Travel...........................................24,00011  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,12   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................32,00013  For Commodities...................................3,620,00014  For Printing.........................................32,00015  For Equipment.......................................105,00016  For Telecommunication Services......................100,00017  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................110,00018    Total                                         $58,518,00019SHERIDAN CORRECTIONAL CENTER20  For Personal Services............................42,143,00021  For Student, Member, and Inmate22   Compensation.......................................320,00023  For State Contributions to24   Social Security..................................3,224,00025  For Contractual Services.........................17,850,00026  For Travel...........................................18,000  SB4097- 21 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,2   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners....................9,0003  For Commodities...................................2,850,0004  For Printing.........................................37,0005  For Equipment........................................75,0006  For Telecommunication Services......................124,0007  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................95,0008    Total                                         $66,745,0009NORTHERN RECEPTION AND CLASSIFICATION CENTER10  For Personal Services............................87,195,00011  For Student, Member, and Inmate12   Compensation.......................................150,00013  For State Contributions to14   Social Security..................................6,671,00015  For Contractual Services.........................30,420,00016  For Travel..........................................228,00017  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,18   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................55,00019  For Commodities...................................4,000,00020  For Printing.........................................70,00021  For Equipment........................................75,00022  For Telecommunication Services......................250,00023  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................585,00024    Total                                        $129,699,00025TAYLORVILLE CORRECTIONAL CENTER26  For Personal Services............................31,616,000  SB4097- 22 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Student, Member, and Inmate Compensation........320,0002  For State Contributions to 3   Social Security..................................2,419,0004  For Contractual Services.........................10,030,0005  For Travel............................................6,0006  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,7   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................13,8008  For Commodities...................................2,200,0009  For Printing.........................................22,00010  For Equipment........................................75,00011  For Telecommunication Services.......................82,00012  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................80,00013    Total                                         $46,863,80014VANDALIA CORRECTIONAL CENTER15  For Personal Services............................37,424,00016  For Student, Member, and Inmate17   Compensation.......................................215,00018  For State Contributions to19   Social Security..................................2,863,00020  For Contractual Services..........................7,080,00021  For Travel............................................9,00022  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,23   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................25,00024  For Commodities...................................7,100,00025  For Printing.........................................17,10026  For Equipment........................................75,000  SB4097- 23 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Telecommunication Service........................50,0002  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................245,0003    Total                                         $55,103,1004VIENNA CORRECTIONAL CENTER5  For Personal Services............................35,757,0006  For Student, Member, and Inmate7   Compensation.......................................190,0008  For State Contributions to9   Social Security..................................2,736,00010  For Contractual Services..........................7,175,00011  For Travel...........................................14,00012  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,13   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................35,00014  For Commodities...................................2,438,50015  For Printing.........................................23,20016  For Equipment.......................................140,00017  For Telecommunication Services.......................99,00018  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................123,00019    Total                                         $48,730,70020WESTERN ILLINOIS CORRECTIONAL CENTER21  For Personal Services............................39,862,00022  For Student, Member, and Inmate23   Compensation.......................................375,00024  For State Contributions to25   Social Security..................................3,050,00026  For Contractual Services.........................11,635,000  SB4097- 24 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1  For Travel...........................................21,0002  For Travel and Allowances for Committed,3   Paroled, and Discharged Prisoners...................13,3004  For Commodities...................................4,500,0005  For Printing.........................................45,0006  For Equipment.......................................105,0007  For Telecommunication Services.......................90,0008  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................160,0009    Total                                         $59,856,300 10    Section 50. No contract shall be entered into or 11obligation incurred or any expenditure made from any 12appropriation herein made in Section 35 of this Article until 13after the purpose and amounts have been approved in writing by 14the Governor. 15ARTICLE 216    Section 5. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the Sex Offender 18Management Board Fund to the Sex Offender Management Board for 19the purposes authorized by the Sex Offender Management Board 20Act including, but not limited to, sex offender evaluation, 21treatment, and monitoring programs and grants. Funding 22received from private sources is to be expended in accordance 23with the terms and conditions placed upon the funding.   SB4097- 25 -OMB104 00181 CMA 10181 b1ARTICLE 32    Section 5. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as may 3be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Corrections 4from the General Revenue Fund for a grant to the Illinois 5Sentencing Policy Advisory Council. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 72026.